Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1099.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16183. (1) The department may grant an emeritus license to an individual if that individual submits to the department an application for an emeritus license on a form provided by the department. An emeritus license granted under this section does not confer any right to the individual to engage in the practice of a health profession. (2) The department shall grant an emeritus license if the applicant meets all of the following: (a) The applicant is retired from engaging in the practice of a health profession. (b) The applicant submits documentation to the department demonstrating that the applicant was previously licensed to engage in the practice of a health profession and that the applicant's license was in good standing at the time the applicant's license expired. (c) The applicant provides acknowledgment that the applicant will not engage in the practice of the health profession for which the applicant was previously licensed. (3) An individual who is granted an emeritus license under this section shall not use any term associated with a license for a health profession under this act in any written or printed matter or display without adding "emeritus" to the term.